Missouri, session 2026, HB2267.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 252.300, 252.303, 252.306, 252.309, 252.312, 252.315, 252.318,
252.321, 252.324, 252.327, 252.330, 252.333, and 640.030, RSMo, are repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 640.030, to read as follows:
640.030. The department of natural resources and the department of conservation
shall develop an interagency plan and execute an interagency agreement regarding the
application and use of any portion of funds authorized for the respective departments by
provisions of the Constitution, taking into consideration the purposes for which the voters
approved the funds and the extent to which expenditures under the provisions of [sections
252.300 to 252.333, or] sections 620.552 to 620.574[,] accomplish such purposes. Such
interagency agreements shall not be subject to legislative review or oversight and are not rules
within the meaning of any law providing for review by the general assembly or any
committee thereof.
[252.300. 1. Sections 252.300 to 252.333 shall be known and may be
cited as "The Missouri Economic Diversification and Afforestation Act of
1990".
2. It is the intent of sections 252.300 to 252.333 to address
environmental, economic, and social programs with a long-term, integrated
strategy that will result in soil conservation, improved water and air quality,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2267 2
enhanced wildlife habitat, increased job opportunities, and reduced social
problems, to the benefit of all citizens of the state of Missouri.]
[252.303. The department may develop and implement, in cooperation
with the University of Missouri college of agriculture, the University of
Missouri center for agroforestry, the University of Missouri extension service,
the Missouri department of natural resources, private industry councils and the
Missouri department of agriculture, an agroforestry program. The program
shall be designed to encourage the development of a state program of
agroforestry, and shall encourage soil conservation and diversifications of the
state's agricultural base through the use of trees planted in an agroforestry
configuration to accommodate alley cropping, forested-riparian buffers,
silvopasture and windbreaks.]
[252.306. As used in sections 252.300 to 252.333, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Alley cropping", planting rows of trees at wide spacings and
cropping the alleyways;
(2) "Conservation reserve program", the conservation reserve program
authorized by the Federal Food Security Act of 1985, as amended, (Title XII,
P.L. 99-198), or its successor program;
(3) "Department", the Missouri department of conservation;
(4) "Director", the director of the Missouri department of
conservation;
(5) "Eligible land", agricultural land which is susceptible to soil
erosion that has a recent cropping history, marginal pastureland, land
surrounding livestock enclosures and riparian zones;
(6) "Eligible practices", single or multiple rows of trees, alone or
combined with other plants such as grass, conventional row crops or
horticulture crops, and animals located at intervals of distance within or
around fields, around livestock enclosures, and along streams and rivers,
specifically designed to provide production and environmental enhancement
benefits in accordance with the practices identified in section 252.303;
(7) "Enhancement phase", the period of time, not to exceed ten years,
immediately following the establishment phase, during which payments are
made by the state of Missouri to landowners who use their eligible land for
agroforestry purposes as required by the department;
(8) "Establishment phase", the period of time during which eligible
land is being prepared for planting trees and developing agroforestry practices,
as determined by the director of the department;
(9) "Forested-riparian buffers", a combination of trees and other
vegetation established parallel to streams and rivers;
(10) "Silvopasture", combining trees with forage and livestock;
(11) "Windbreaks", planting single or multiple rows of trees for
protection and enhanced production of crops and animals.]
[252.309. 1. The director may enter into agreements with individual
landowners to make incentive payments during the enhancement phase to

HB 2267 3
landowners. Recipients of such payments shall utilize the land for which such
payment is made for agroforestry purposes as required by the director pursuant
to sections 252.300 to 252.333.
2. The amount of state incentive payment made to a landowner per
acre of eligible land shall be an amount which, when added to any cash or in-
kind net income produced by crops raised on the land, is substantially equal to
the amount per acre previously paid or which would have been paid to the
landowner under the federal conservation reserve program.
3. If an application made pursuant to section 252.315 is approved by
the director, the director shall develop a schedule of annual payments to be
made by the state.
4. The state shall not make any payment to a landowner to maintain
the use of eligible land during the enhancement phase for agroforestry
purposes after ten years have elapsed since the first such incentive payment is
made.]
[252.312. The state payments provided for in sections 252.309,
252.330, and 252.333 may be made from funds available to the department of
conservation, soil conservation funds made available by the department of
natural resources from the tax imposed by Sections 47(a), 47(b) and 47(c) of
Article IV of the Constitution of Missouri, funds appropriated by the general
assembly for that purpose, grants, bequests or gifts, or any combination
thereof.]
[252.315. 1. To participate in the program, the landowner shall make
application to the director in writing. The written application shall show the
number of acres to be placed in the program and that the land which is to be
placed in the agroforestry program meets the eligibility requirements of this
section. The application shall also contain a detailed plan of the landowner's
proposal to meet the requirements of sections 252.300 to 252.333, including
the type and number of trees to be planted, established, or managed, the type
of compatible grass, other crops and such other information as may be deemed
necessary. The number of trees required to satisfy eligibility may vary with
agroforestry practice, but in each case shall be a sufficient number to guarantee
the success of the practice and shall be consistent with standards established
for each practice.
2. The director shall review each application. In reviewing the
application the director shall determine the type or types of soil located in the
area of the land proposed to be included in the agroforestry program and shall
apply the land capability classification system to determine the potential or
limitations of the land for inclusion in the program. Before the director acts
upon the application, an on-site inspection shall be made by a representative of
the department of conservation or its approved agent. The inspecting
representative shall attest to the efficacy of the agroforestry plan to be used,
the number of acres to be placed under agroforestry management, the species
and number of trees to be planted, established, or managed, and other crop
components of the proposed program. After the report of the on-site inspector
and the review by the director, the director shall determine the landowner's

HB 2267 4
eligibility to participate in the agroforestry program and shall determine the
amount of cost sharing, including in-kind and labor components, for the
landowner. If the director fails to approve an application, the aggrieved
landowner may request a hearing before the conservation commission or its
authorized representative within thirty days of notice to the landowner of the
failure of the conservation department to approve the application, or the
landowner may proceed under the provisions of section 536.150 as if the act of
the conservation department was one not subject to administrative review. If
an action is brought pursuant to section 536.150, venue shall be in Cole
County.]
[252.318. 1. All land participating in the agroforestry program shall
be inspected annually by a representative of the director, to ensure that the land
continues to comply with the requirements of sections 252.300 to 252.333 and
that practice specifications are being maintained in accordance with applicable
rules and regulations.
2. If the annual inspection determines that the land is no longer in
compliance with the provisions of sections 252.300 to 252.333 or with the
rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the provisions of sections
252.300 to 252.333, the director shall notify the landowner of that fact and
shall detail the specifics in which the land fails to meet the requirements. The
landowner may respond to the notice within thirty days of receipt, either by
contesting the inspection report or by providing the director with a proposal to
correct the problems which form the basis of the notice. If the landowner
contests the findings of the annual inspection, the aggrieved landowner may
request a hearing before the conservation commission or its authorized
representative or the landowner may proceed under the provisions of section
536.150, as if the act of the conservation department was one not subject to
administrative review. If an action is brought pursuant to section 536.150,
venue shall be in Cole County. If the landowner provides the director with a
proposal to correct the problems which form the basis of the notice, the
director shall review the proposal and, if the director finds such proposal
acceptable, shall allow the landowner to implement the proposal to correct the
alleged problems and shall not suspend the annual payment to the landowner
under the provisions of sections 252.300 to 252.333. If the landowner is
unable or unwilling to correct the alleged problems in a manner acceptable to
the director, the landowner shall not receive the subsequent payments due
under the provisions of sections 252.300 to 252.333.]
[252.321. The University of Missouri center for agroforestry and
extension service, in consultation with the director, shall establish agroforestry
demonstration areas, and develop and deliver the educational components of
sections 252.300 to 252.333.]
[252.324. 1. The director may promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 252.300 to 252.333. Before
promulgating any such rule, the director shall seek the advice and comments of
the University of Missouri college of agriculture, the University of Missouri

HB 2267 5
center for agroforestry, the University of Missouri extension service, the
Missouri department of natural resources, private industry councils, the
Missouri department of economic development and the Missouri department
of agriculture. The director may seek advice and comments before
promulgating rules and regulations from the United States Department of
Agriculture and any other entities deemed advisable by the director. No rule or
portion of a rule promulgated under the authority of this chapter shall become
effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of chapter
536.
2. The Missouri department of conservation may contract with the
division of soil and water conservation of the Missouri department of natural
resources for any administrative functions required under the provisions of
sections 252.300 to 252.333.]
[252.327. 1. The department of conservation and the department of
economic development and the University of Missouri college of agriculture
shall, by each of the dates specified in subsection 2 of this section, jointly
produce a report on the agroforestry program which:
(1) Provides a status report on the afforestation aspects of the
agroforestry program by presenting a forecast of anticipated economic
developments from the afforestation in the state as a result of the
agroforestry program;
(2) Suggests public or private sector initiatives that will potentially
serve to maximize the economic benefits for related new development and
expansion of existing businesses resulting from the agroforestry program;
(3) Suggests methods to promote the development of wood and other
forestry related products;
(4) Suggests public or private sector initiatives or methods which will
result in significant increases in job opportunities and employment.
2. The report shall be submitted to the governor and to the general
assembly by January thirty-first of each of the following years: 1996, 2001,
2006, 2011, 2016, 2021, and 2026.]
[252.330. During the establishment phase, the director may pay for the
planting of trees on eligible land which is used for agroforestry pursuant to
sections 252.300 to 252.333. Such payment shall be limited to expenses which
are determined to be reasonable and necessary by the director, but shall not
exceed seventy-five percent of the cost of establishment.]
[252.333. The director may make incentive payments for agroforestry
purposes of land enrolled in this program. The duration of such payments
shall not exceed ten years. The director may also expend funds to plant trees
on such land. Such expenditures may include both planting and associated
practices as determined by the director.]
✔